patterns/hyph-cs-sojka.tex
% Authors: Petr Sojka <sojka (at) fi.muni.cz>, Ondrej Sojka <454904 (at) mail.muni.cz>
% 
% Version: 2021-07-21
% Czechoslovak hyphenation patterns
% Generated with correct optimized parameters (cs-sojka-correctoptimized.par)
% For further information, see TUGboat issue with proceedings of TUG 2021
% For source code, see github.com/tensojka/cshyphen
%
%
% MIT License
% Copyright (c) 2019 Sojka
% Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"), to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense, and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
% The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
%
\patterns{
.ad3aw
.ads4
.af3r
.ai4č
.ak3ry
.al3s
.as3k
.as3t
.at3at.
.bel3h
.blou3
.bs4k
.by3l
.ch2
.ct2
.čers3
.ču3c
.dep3t
.do3č
.do3v
.dsm3
.ďa2
.ea2
.ef3l
.eg3r
.ei3g
.ek3l
.ek3r
.el3er
.el3sh
.ens3
.epp3
.es3t
.ép1
.filt3
.ges3
.goz3
.hos3l
.hyz3
.ih1
.in3ea
.in3el.
.is3
.íli3
.ís1
.ja3a
.js3m
.leg3r
.li4št.
.ls2
.lš2
.lust3
.md2
.mi4a
.mig3
.mo4u
.ms2
.na3m
.na3v
.ná3h
.ne3č
.ne3i
.ne3tk
.obe3l
.ob4lit
.ob3ř
.ode3j
.od3i
.od4ran
.od3rá
.on3ai
.os3t3r
.ot3rel
.ot4roci
.ot3ru
.ož2
.po3č
.po3v
.ps4
.re3e
.re3op
.roc4
.ro3cko
.ro3cku
.ro3č4ko
.ru3b
.rý1
.se3mn
.se3tk
.si3anu
.sk2
.st2
.st4rav
.st4rel
.st4reš
.stri4hn
.št2
.ště3d
.uc2
.uk2
.us2
.us4p
.uš2
.ut2
.uv4n
.uz4m
.uz3re
.vúc3k
.vý1
.xa3c
.yia3
.za3
.zd2
.zú1
.zú3p
a1aa
aa3aj
aa3al
aa3as
a1ač
a1ad2
a1af
a3ah.
a1ai
a1ak
aa4ke
aa4ki
aa4ko
aa4ky
2a1am
aa4na
a3and
a3anh
aa4ni
aa4nu
a3anx
aa4ny
a1ao
a1ap
a1aq
a1ar
aa4ra
aa4re
aa4ru
aa4rů
aa4ry
aas3t
a1aš
a1at
a1au
a4av
a1aw
2a1ay
a1az
abaš3
a4beb
ab3lí
ab3lo
a4blu
abri3c
ab3rm
abs3kí
3abso
abs3t
abš2
a3bt4
aby3j
a3bz
2ac
a3cá
a1cc
a1cd
ace3c
a1cé
a4ch.
a3chd
a3ché
a3chí
a3chl
a3chľ
a3chm
a3chň
a3chř
a3cht
a3chů
a3chú
aci3án
a1cj
ackt4
a3cl.
a3cla
a3clí
a3clo
a3clu
a3cly
a1cr
ac3rom
a1cs
a3cta
a3ctb
a4cte
a3ctf
ac3tm
a3ctr
a3cts
a1cw
a1cz
2ač.
2ačk
a1čm
ač3re
a3čs.
a1čt
a4čti
ad3ade
3adap
a2db
4adí
3adj
a1dĺ
ad3m
3adoc
ad3ra
ad3ru
ad3už
a1dv
a1ď
aebi3
ae1c
aeg3el
ae2h
a3e3le
a3elk
a3eng
aeo3
ae2r
a3er.
ae3rm
ae4si
aes3t
a1e2v
a1ex
af2j
af3la
af3lo
af3tů
a2fx
ageb3
a2gh
ag3há
ag3he
ag3hl
ag3ho
ag1l
ag3ran
3ag3re
ag3ro
ag4u
4agů
a2gw
a1h
a4hlý
ah2ľ
ah3re
a2ht
ah3v
ai4čo
ai2e
ai3g2
aill3o
a3ind
aint4r
ai3p
a3ivis
aix1
a3jde
a1jď
aj3ip
a1jm
aj4o
aju4n
a1jž
a3ka
a1ká
a3k2d
a1ké
4akh
a1kí
a1kl
ak3lé
a1kň
a1ko
akou3z
ak3ra
ak3ria
ak3ris
ak3rín
ak3ro
1akř
ak3ře
3aksá
aktů3
3akut
ak3va
a1ky
a1ký
a1l
al3asa
al3att
al1h
ali3g
al3isl
all3ame
ally3
alost3
a2lr
alš2
alust3
al3yam
aly3o
a1ľú
3amiv
a2mm
a2mn
a3m2ň
amo3uc
amo3uč
3ampé
amp3l
am3pt
a3mr
am3raď
ams3kí
ams3t
amš3t
3amtk
a2mů
a3můž
an3ami
3andc
3andě
and4roc
and4rom.
and4ruc
and4rus
and3up
ane4j
an3end
an3ero
2ani
a3nnis
2a3no
3anoš
a1nô
ans3cr
ans3kí
ans3u
anš3p
ant3r
an3ud
an3yv
3anzs
a2ňe
a2ňj
a2ňm
a2ňt
a2ňu
a1ob
ao4bl
ao2c
a1oč
a1od
a1o2h
ao3in
ao4iz
a1ok
a1op
ao3pc
ao2ř
a1os
a3ost
aos3t3ř
a3otc
2aow
ao2z
3apira
ap3je
2apl
a3pm
a3pň
3apok
a2pp
apri3o
ap3rob
ap3rů
a3pš
apy1
a1ra
ar3aga
a1rá
a4ráš
ar3dž
a3re
a1ré
ar3f
a1rí
ar2j4
ar3mb
a3ro
aro4ck
aro3us
ar4pů
arš3t
ar3th
ar3tl
3artri
a1ru
a1rů
arůs3
a3rvan
a1ry
a1rý
a1řa
a1řá
a1ř2č
a1ře
a1ři
a1ří
a3řkno
a1řv
as4chi
a2sč
ase4ps
a2sf
as3hm
3asij
as3int
as3ké
as3kk
as4kr
as4kuj
as3ký
as4ml
a3so
as3rá
as3rd
as3ro
as3tan
as3tĺ
3astm
ast3rel
astrih4
ast4rihl
ast4riho
asu3c
as4vi
asy3ř
aš2i
aš3pl
aš4pu
aš3ta
aš3tí.
a1t
3a4tei
at4el
2ath
a2tj
2atk
at1l
a2tľ
at4ľo
at4ram
at4rav
at3rán
at3rel
at3rem
at3rín
at3ro
at3rum
at3ruš
at3ří
at3sk
atš2
at4tě
at4tl
att3ro
a2ťc
a2ťk
a2ťm
a2ťt
a2ťů
au1a
au3in
a1uj
au3lla
1aup
aus3p
aus3t
aust3r
au4th
aut3r
a1už
a1ů
a1úh1
a1úk
aú3le
a1úp
a1ú1r
a1úř
a1ú2s1
a1út
2av
a4vču
a2vd
av3eg
a3vh
a2vm
avo3uh
av3ru
a3vst
avů3re
a1w
aw3ab
a2wr
a1x
2ax.
a1ya
aya3a
ay1c
ay3eur
a1yl
ay3oc
a3yot
ays3k
ayš1
a3yt
ay3th
a1z
az4ak
az3az.
az4dú
az3dv
3azep
azi3om
a2zj
a2zk
az4líc
az4lím
az4lít
a2zm
az2p
az2š
a2zt
az2v
ažs3kí
ažš2
ä1dí
äg1l
äh2
ä2j1
äk1l
ä4ku
ä1la
ä1ll
ä1lo
än2
ä1tu
ä1tú
äť2j
ä2ťk
äv1l
á1a
á4blá
á4blé
á4bli
á4blí
á4b3lo
á4blu
á4bly
á4blý
ábs2
ách3l
á2ck
á2ct
á3ctí
ád3ro
á1d1ř
ádš3t
á1d2v
ády3chm
á1dž
á1ď
á1e
áf1l
á2f1r
áf2t
á2gn
ág1r
á1ha
á1há
á1he
á1hi
áh1l
á1ho
áhos3
á1hr
á1hř
á1hu
á2hv
áh3vi
áh3vo
ái1
á2í
á1j
á2jc
á2jd
áj3ok
á4jos
á1k
á2kh
ák3le
á2k2m
á2k3ň
ák3ra
ák1ř
ák2v
á1la
á1lá
1áld
á1le
á2lě
á1lí
3álněe
3álněz
á1lo
álo3k
á1lu
á2ľu
á2mn
ámš2
á1n
á2nr
ánš2
á2nv
á2ňá
á2ňm
áňs2
á2ňt
á2ňu
á2ňů
á1o
á3pň
á2ps
á1ra
ár3ap
á1rá
á4ráš
ár1d
á1re
á2rí
á1r2m
á1ro
árš1
á1ru
á1rů
á1ry
á1rý
á1řa
á1ře
á1ři
á1ří
á2řk
ás4ek
ás3ky
ás3ký
ás4lí
ás3lo
ás4ov
ás2p
ást4r
ás2ť
ás3ťo
áš3le
áš3tr
á1ta
á1tá
á1tě
á1tí
át3lo
át4lou
áto3vn
á1t1r
át4ráš
á1tu
á2tů
á2tv
á1u2
á2vč
áv2d
áv2š
á1wa
á1z2r
áz3ro
á1zv
1b
ba4ad
ba3bb
ba4byd
ba3cko
ba3dú
ba3er
bal3m
ba2ľ
ba3nn
ba2o
bas3k
bas3t
ba4tm
ba3tt.
b1äť
bás3ká
2bb
b3bas
b2bé
bb3lo
bb3rk
2b1c
b3cf
bcr1
2b1č
b1d
2bde
2bdi
3b2dí
2bdo
2bdr
bd3ro
b1ď
b2ea
bea4c
be3an
be3dř
be4dří
bef3a
beh2
b2ei
be3id
be3ie
be3ig
be3ij
be3il
be3im
be3in
be3ir
be3is
be3jd
be3jm
be3ll
be3m
be1o2
be3p2
be3rra
b2es
beš3t
be3ub
be3uk
be3uš
be3ut
be3v
b2ey
be3zdí
bez3os
bez3r
bez3t
bě3ta
béo1
2bf
b2gh
2b1h
bhe1
b2hf
bi3ap
bi2b
bib3l
big3i
bi4gn
bik4r
b2il
bill3o
b1im
bi2ň
bi3oly
bi3om.
b3irg
bist4re
bist4rom
bi4t3l
2b1j
b4j3ad
bj3os
2b1k2
3bl.
b3lac
b3lač
b3lák
b3lea
b3leč
3bled
b3lem
b3let.
b3leta
b3leto
b1lé
3blini
b3lín
b3lov
2bló
b1lô
b3lt
b1lu
blu3et
2blů
b1lú
b3lv
2bm
2b1n
bnod4
bnůs3
2bň
bo2a
bo4bl
bo3cl
bo3dm
bod3r
bo3dř
boe1
bo4og
b4oro
bo3rr
b3ouw
bo3xt
bo3xy
bo1z
2bp
b2ps
b3rač
b4rag
b3rah
b3rai
b3rak
b3ral
b3rata
b3ratn
b3rato
b3rav
b4rax
b3raz
b3ráno
b1re
b1ré
b4rí.
b3rín
b3rít
bro3cko
bro3cku
b3ron
b3roň
b3roo
b3ros
bro3z
brs3k
brs3l
br3tv
b3rua
b3rub
b3rud
b3ruj
b1rů
brůs3
brú4c
bř2
2b1řa
b1řá
b3ře.
b3řej
b3řele
b3řen
b1ři
b1ří
2bs
b2sb
bs2c
b3sk
bs4ka
bs4ke
bs3lú
bs2n
bs2p
bs2s
b4st.
bs4tip
bs4to
bst3re
bs3tú
2bš
b2šl
bš3ta
bš3tr
bš2ť
2b1t
bt3re
2bť
b4u
bu4lle
bus3p
bus3q
bu3tl
bů3re
bů2s
bú3c
b1úz
bü3ck
2bv
bvy2
2bw
b4war
b1we
bya2
2by1č
by3jst
by1k
byr2
bys1
2bz
bz2c
bz1d
bzdú4
bz2r
b2zu
b1z2v
bz4z
2b1ž
1ca
ca1a
ca3cl
ca3db
ca3dd
ca4md
cas3t
cat4r
1cá
2cb
c3bsd
c1c
ccann3
c4cem
c4c4le
1ccs2
c1č
c1d
cdi1
cd3ora
cd1r
cdu1
1ce
ce1a
ce3an
ce4ano
2ceá
ceboo4
ce3chl
ce3cl
cecu4
ce4ja.
ce3ll
ce4mj
cenci3
ce3nni
ce3ob
ce3ok
ce3os
ceri3
2ceť
ceú2
ce3zd
cě2
2cf
2cg
cg3re
3cha
1chá
2chb
3chch
1che
1chh
1chi
4chk
3chl.
ch3lav
ch3le.
2chn
ch2ň
1ch2o
ch3oby
1chó
4chp
3chr
ch3ral
2chs
3chtě.
3chtíc
1chu
3chvi
3chví
1chy
1chý
1ci
cie3nn
cif4rá
ci1i
ci3kn
cini3u
cino3i
cis3a
cis3l
ciš2
1cí
cí3dm
c1j
c4j3ad
cjes3
c1k
4ck.
ck3aj
ck2d
3ckef
3cker
2ckh
2cki
ck3inu
3ckit
2ckl
c2km
3cknr
3ckomí
ck3onl
ck3out
3ckově
2ckt
ck1u
1ckv
c3ký
1c2kz
c1la
c3láč
1clc
c3leh
c4lel
4c3lem
2c1lé
cli3f
clip3
c1lí
c4lít
c4lon
c4lope
c3lova
1clô
1clt
c1lu
c1lý
1c1ľ
c2ľo
2cm
c2md
cmo2
2c1n
c3na
1co
co4ck3
cog2
co3nna
co4og
cot3l
1cô
1c2p
cp3dm
c4pe
c3pl
c3po
cp3s
2cq
c2ra
c1ré
c2ri
c3rob
c4robi
c4roi
c3ron.
c4rone
c1ry
c2sá
c2sf
cs4kup
2c2ss
c3sst
c2sů
2csy
2ct.
c1ta
c3tár
c3táv
2cte
3ctern
c2tě
c3tl
c4tli
3ctn
2cto
ct2p
c3tr
ct3ra
c4t4ras
ct4rav
c4tre
c4trod
c4trom
c4trow
c4tru.
ct3rum
c1tř
ct2t
2c1tu
c4tuu
c1tů
c1tv
c3tz
2cť
1cu
cu3ch
cu3cl
cuk3rá
cu4lle
cu3tl
3ců
cůz1
1cú
cú4ch.
1c2v
c3van
c3ví
c3vk
2cvo
c1x
1cy
cyk1
cy4ko
cyp1
cys1
cý2
c1z
cza4m
c3zc
cz3n
cz3s
1ča
ča1c
ča4ck
čaf1
ča3iv
čak3l
čapoch3
čas3tě
1čá
2čb
č1c
1čch
č4chi
č4chu
č1č
č1dí
č1dp
1če
če3chl
čech3r
če4hl
čes3k
češ3t
če4ví
2č2f1
čg2
č1ho
č1hu
1či
čib4
čis3l
čis3tě
1čí
3čín
čís3i
č2j
č1k
čk1l
čk4lé
č3ko
1čl
č1la
2čli
1č2má
č2mě
č3mí
č2my
č1n
1čo
čok4
čong3
čos4k
1č2p
č3pa
1čr
č1ra
2čs
č2sh
čs3kí
č2ss
čš1
č1t2
1čt.
1čta
1č2tl
1čtr
č2tř
č2tů
1č2tv
1čty
1ču
ču1c
1čů
čú3c
1čúť
čva4
čy1
1čz
č1ž
1d2a
da3a
da3ct
da3ik
da3iz
d3alp
da4mj
da3rr
d3art.
dazi3
dä1
1dá
d2bá
d3bb
2dbe
d3bh
4dbuy
2d1c
dc3d
dch2
3dchn
d2ct
2d1č
dčís4lím
d1d
dd3art
dd2l
dd2ř
dds3
dd2v
d1ď
1de
de3am
de3an
de1e2
3deer
de3ft
de4ht
de3ia
de3id
dei3g
de3jdi
de3jmi
de3jmo
de3kd
de3m
dem3ose
de3ob
de3ony
dep2
de3pn
dept3ec
d2er
des4ra
det3v
3deu
de3vč
de1z
dez3o
1dě
1dé
2df
df2f
dfilt4e
df2l
dfo2
df2s
df2t
4dge
d2gi
d2gn
d2gw
d1h2
dh3ci
dh3d
d2hí
d3hk
2dho
dho3c
dh3z
1di
di3an.
di3ane
di3ák.
di3ch
di3el
d3ign
d3ihr
d3ind
di3ovs
di3p
di4ps
dist4re.
dist4rec
d3isť
di3ur
1dí.
3díc
1díč
1díh
1dík
1díl
2dím
1dín
1dír
1dí2š
1dít
1dív
1díž
d1j4
dje2
d2jp
2d1k2
dk3m
dk4rú
dk4ú
1d1l
dle3e
dl4ha.
dli3š
dm3ač
dm3ad
dm3ap
dm3ase
dm3aše
dm3atř
1d2md
dmi3l
3dmou
dmrš3
3dmut
2d1n
2dň
1d2o
do1a2
d3o4bl
d3oboj
d3ob3ra
d4ob4rať
d3obyč
do3cka
do3cke
do3ckl
do3cko
do3cks
do3cku
doc3r
do3ctv
d3očn
do3čt
d3odd
do3dn
d3odr
doh2
do1i
do3jm
d3oke
do3od
do3ok
3dop
do3pn
d3orl
d3oso
3dosu
do3t
dot4r
dou3b
do3uč
do3uh
do3uk
do3um
do3upr
do3uší
do3už
do3vč
do3vp
do4xů
do1z2
dozi3
1dö
dô1l
dp4
dpo3č
d2ps
1dr
d3ra.
d3rad
d4rah
d3ral
d4rap
d3ras
d3raš
d4ray
d3raz
d4raž
d3rác
d3ráč
d3rád
d3rál
d3rbo
d4rc
d1re
dre3o
d1ré
d3rky
d2rl
d3roc
d4rocu
d3roče
d3rod
d3rof
d3rok
d4roľ
d3roo
drop3i
d3ros
d3roš
d3rot
d3rou
d3roz
dro3zl
d3rož
d2rö
d3ruč
d4ruf
d3rum
d3ruš
d1rů
drůs3
d2rú
d1ry
d3rý
d2rz
dr3zb
4dř.
d1řa
d1řá
3d3ře.
d3řeč
3dřep
d1ři
3dřim
d1ří
3dřít
1dřo
2ds2
dsá3z
d2sb
ds3č
dses4
d2sf
ds3kop
ds3ľ
ds3ml
dsp4
dst2
dst4rel
dstri4
ds3up
dsz1
2dš2
dš4í
dš3ťu
2d1t
dt3lá
dt3ro
d2tt
2dť
1du
du3án
dub3l
d3uči
dudá3
duf2
du4ll
d3umí
dup4lov
duri3
dus3t
dus4tm
1dů1
2důb
dů4rá
dů4re
1dúb
dú3c
dú4ch.
dú4ck
dú1k
dú4ku
d1úm
d1ú2n
1dúř
1dúz
1dü
dv2
3dvac
3dvak
3dvan
2dvá
d3vč
2dvl
d3vs
d2vu
d2vv
2dvý
d2vž
2d1w
1dx
1dy
dy3kt
dy3l
dy2s3
1dý
d3z2
dz4g
dzi4okr
dz4ny
4dž.
1dža
džas3
4džác
dž2b
1d2že
3dži.
dži3o
d2ží
2džr
dž2t
1džu
1džů
2džv
1ďa
ďa2ď
ďan3a
ďa2š
1ďá
ďá4bl
ď1c
1ďh
2ď1k
ď1l
ď1n
1ďo
ďovi3
ď1t
ďů1
ďú1
ď1z
ď1ž
each3it
ea3cti
e3ada
e3adm
ead3u
e3adv
e1ae
e1ag
e1ak
e3alk
e3alp
e3ama
e3amb
e3amp
e3ani
eap2
eas3tr
e3asu
e3ató
e3atra
eat3t
e3átk
eback3
eb3aue
eb1ä
e3b2b
e2bd
e3bda
e4beb
ebé2
eb3le
eb3lí
e4blu
eb3rž
eb1ř
ebs4k
ebs4ter.
ebš1
ec3apr
ec4cl
e1cé
e3chlo
ech3odt
e3chv
ec3k2
e3cke
eck3ine
eck4m
eck3r
ec1l
ec1q
e1cr
ect2
e3ctě
e3ctí
ec4tum
e2cú
ecú4c
ec3vr
ecy2
ečis3
e3čká
e3čte
ed3art
edi3on
edjez3
e3dma
e3d4mn
e3dněp
ed3obc
ed3oly
ed3ope
e1dô
ed4rum
e4dřiš
e2dv
e1dž
e4džo
e2ďá
ee3em
e3efu
e3ego
ee4ja
e1e2k
e3em.
e3eme
e3emi
e3emo
e3emp
e3ems
e3emu
e3eph
e1eq
e3ess
e2et
ee2v
e1e2x
ee1z
ee4zzo
eě1
ef3ana
ef3ré
e2gn
e3go
3ego.
eg3rac
eg3ran
eg3reg
eg3rí
egus3
e2gw
e1h
e3ha
e2hb
e2hč
e3he
eh3lo
e2hĺ
e4hľ
eh4m
eh3reš
e2hŕ
e3hu
eh3úd
eh3út
e3hy
eh3ýl
e3ičk
eig2
ei3gha
ei3gho
eint4
e3is.
e3isl
e2it
eí2s
e4j3ab
e4jag
ej3am
eja4r
ej3aro
ej3chl
eje4k
e4j3emo
e4j3ene
e4j3e4s
e4j3id
e4j3in
ej3kt
ej3my
ej3o4b
ej3o4c
ej3oč
ej3o4d
ej3of
ej3o4h
ej3ok
ej3op
ej3o4s
ej3o4š
ej3o4t
ej3o4ž
ej4tvá
ej3u4b
ej3uk
ejum4
ej3u4n
ej3up
ej3us
ej3uš
ej3uv
e2jú
e1ká
e1ké
e1kí
e1kl
ek3lh
ek3lí
e3kně
e1ko
e3kr
ek3rac
e1ky
e1ký
e1la
el3avi
e1lá
e1le
3elea
el3el
e1lé
el4ha.
el4hal
el4ham
e3lhá
el3ho
e1lí
4elni
4elní
e3lo
3elof
el1r
els3ed
e1lu
e1lú
e3ly
emd2
e2mh
emi3um
e4mm
e2mn
e3mnou
e3mnu
emp4lo
ems2
e2mž
e3na
en3anm
ena4vs
end4roc
end4rom
end4ruc
ene4i
enes3t3
e3nic
en3kt
3ennea
e3nnis
en3ox
ens3kí
en3ss
ens3ta
ens3t3r
en3tni
ent3r
en4tř
en3tz
e1nv
e2ňe
e2ňj
e2ňm
e2ňt
e2ňu
eo1a
e3obc
e3o4bl
e3obr
e3oby
e1o1c
e1o2č
e1od
eo3dne
eod4rá
e3oft
eog2
e1oh
eo3in
eok2
e3omy
eo1o
e3otes
e3otř
e3ott
eou2
eo3uk
eouká3
eo3ur
e3ovl
eov3r
e1o2x
eo1z
ep1d
epi3ch
ep3lé
ep3lí
ep3lo
ep3lô
ep3lýt
4epo
epo3č
ep3rel
ep3rit
ep3rl
ep3rof
ep3roo
ep3řín
3epsh
ept3ak
ep3up
e1q
e1ra
er3act
er3ae
er3age
er3agu
er3akc
er3akč
er3akt
e3rá
e4ráš
e2rb
erč2
e1re
er3ele
e1ré
er1h
er3int
e1rí
erk4m
erk4ve
er3nn
e1ro
er3ope
er3orá
er3oř
er4pů
ers4ko
e1ru
er3up.
er3upo
er3upů
er3ur
e1rů
erůs3
e1ry
e1rý
e1ř
e2řk
